Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2076.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 15, chapter 2, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-249.20, to read: START_STATUTE15-249.20. Save our children school safety program; employee certification; fund; eligibility to carry firearm; confidentiality; violation; classification; immunity; biennial report; definition A. The save our children school safety program is established within the department to strengthen school safety through employee training, medical preparedness and crisis-response capability. The department may adopt rules, policies and procedures to implement this section. B. The department, in consultation with the Arizona peace officer standards and training board, shall develop and maintain a list of training and certification programs, including annual recertification programs, that are approved by the arizona peace officer standards and training board pursuant to section 41-1822, subsection d. The department shall post the list on the department's website. C. The save our children school safety program fund is established and consists of legislative appropriations, gifts, grants and OTHER MONIES received for the save our children school safety program. The department shall administer the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated and are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations. The department shall use monies in the fund to provide reimbursements on a first-come, first-served basis for the following: 1. An eligible school that has either: (a) Paid for one or more of the eligible school's employees to complete a training or certification program listed pursuant to subsection B of this section. (b) Purchased school safety equipment, medical kits or protective gear for use at one or more school sites. 2. An individual who meets all of the following: (a) Is employed by an eligible school. (b) Has paid for and successfully completed a training or certification program listed pursuant to subsection B of this section. (c) Is not reimbursed by the eligible school for the costs of the training or certification program. D. An eligible school may adopt written policies to authorize one or more employees to carry a concealed firearm on school grounds if the eligible school does all of the following: 1. Notifies local law enforcement agencies and the department of the number of employees who are authorized to carry a concealed firearm on school grounds pursuant to this subsection. 2. Ensures that each employee who is authorized to carry a concealed firearm on school grounds pursuant to this subsection has a valid certification pursuant to a program listed pursuant to subsection B of this section. 3. Complies with the confidentiality requirements prescribed in subsection E of this section. E. Notwithstanding any other law, the personally identifiable information of each school employee who participates in a training or certification program listed pursuant to subsection B of this section or who is authorized to carry a concealed firearm on school grounds pursuant to subsection D of this section is confidential and may not be disclosed to the public. For the purposes of this subsection, personally identifiable information includes the employee's name, training schedule and deployment. A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a class 1 misdemeanor. F. Notwithstanding any other law, a public school employee who has a valid certification from a program listed pursuant to subsection B of this section and who acts in good faith and consistently with the certification program is not subject to civil or criminal liability for the school employee's actions in defense of students, school employees or school visitors. G. any Policies adopted by a school pursuant to subsection D of this section constitute a program approved by the school for the pURPOSES of section 13-3102, subsection I, paragraph 2. H. On or before December 31 of each odd-numbered year, the department shall submit a report on the save our children school safety program to the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate and the governor's office, shall submit a copy to the secretary of state and shall post a copy on the department's website. The report required by this subsection must include all of the following: 1. The total number of school employees who have a valid certification from a program listed pursuant to subsection B of this section. 2. The total number of school employees who are authorized to carry a concealed firearm on school grounds pursuant to subsection D of this section. 3. The amount of monies available in the fund established by subsection C of this section. 4. Information regarding any incident or program feedback. 5. Recommendations, if any, to improve the program established by this section. I. For the purposes of this section, "eligible school" means any school in this state that offers instruction to students in a kindergarten program or any of grades one through twelve. END_STATUTE Sec. 2.2. Section 15-341, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-341. General powers and duties; immunity; delegation A. Each school district governing board shall: 1. Prescribe and enforce policies and procedures to govern the schools that are not inconsistent with the laws or rules prescribed by the state board of education. 2. Exclude from schools all books, publications, papers or audiovisual materials of a sectarian, partisan or denominational character. This paragraph does not prohibit the elective course allowed by section 15-717.01. 3. Manage and control the school property within its district, except that a district may enter into a partnership with an entity, including a charter school, another school district or a military base, to operate a school or offer educational services in a district building, including at a vacant or partially used building, or in any building on the entity's property pursuant to a written agreement between the parties. 4. Acquire school furniture, apparatus, equipment, library books and supplies for the schools to use. 5. Prescribe the curricula and criteria for the promotion and graduation of pupils as provided in sections 15-701 and 15-701.01. 6. Furnish, repair and insure, at full insurable value, the school property of the district. 7. Construct school buildings on approval by a vote of the district electors. 8. In the name of the district, convey property belonging to the district and sold by the board. 9. Purchase school sites when authorized by a vote of the district at an election conducted as nearly as practicable in the same manner as the election provided in section 15-481 and held on a date prescribed in section 15-491, subsection E, but such authorization shall not necessarily specify the site to be purchased and such authorization shall not be necessary to exchange unimproved property as provided in section 15-342, paragraph 23. 10. Construct, improve and furnish buildings used for school purposes when such buildings or premises are leased from the national park service. 11. Purchase school sites or construct, improve and furnish school buildings from the proceeds of the sale of school property only on approval by a vote of the district electors. 12. Hold pupils to strict account for disorderly conduct on school property. 13. Discipline students for disorderly conduct on the way to and from school. 14. Except as provided in section 15-1224, deposit all monies received by the district as gifts, grants and devises with the county treasurer who shall credit the deposits as designated in the uniform system of financial records. If not inconsistent with the terms of the gifts, grants and devises given, any balance remaining after expenditures for the intended purpose of the monies have been made shall be used to reduce school district taxes for the budget year, except that in the case of accommodation schools the county treasurer shall carry the balance forward for use by the county school superintendent for accommodation schools for the budget year. 15. Provide that, if a parent or legal guardian chooses not to accept a decision of the teacher as provided in paragraph 42 of this subsection, the parent or legal guardian may request in writing that the governing board review the teacher's decision. This paragraph does not release school districts from any liability relating to a child's promotion or retention. 16. Provide for adequate supervision over pupils in instructional and noninstructional activities by certificated or noncertificated personnel. 17. Use school monies received from the state and county school apportionment exclusively to pay salaries of teachers and other employees and contingent expenses of the district. 18. Annually report to the county school superintendent on or before October 1 in the manner and form and on the blanks prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction or county school superintendent. The board shall also report directly to the county school superintendent or the superintendent of public instruction whenever required. 19. Deposit all monies received by school districts other than student activities monies or monies from auxiliary operations as provided in sections 15-1125 and 15-1126 with the county treasurer to the credit of the school district except as provided in paragraph 20 of this subsection and sections 15-1223 and 15-1224, and the board shall spend the monies as provided by law for other school funds. 20. Establish bank accounts in which the board during a month may deposit miscellaneous monies received directly by the district. The board shall remit monies deposited in the bank accounts at least monthly to the county treasurer for deposit as provided in paragraph 19 of this subsection and in accordance with the uniform system of financial records. 21. Prescribe and enforce policies and procedures for disciplinary action against a teacher who engages in conduct that is a violation of the policies of the governing board but that is not cause for dismissal of the teacher or for revocation of the certificate of the teacher. Disciplinary action may include suspension without pay for a period of time not to exceed ten school days. Disciplinary action shall not include suspension with pay or suspension without pay for a period of time longer than ten school days. The procedures shall include notice, hearing and appeal provisions for violations that are cause for disciplinary action. The governing board may designate a person or persons to act on behalf of the board on these matters. 22. Prescribe and enforce policies and procedures for disciplinary action against an administrator who engages in conduct that is a violation of the policies of the governing board regarding duties of administrators but that is not cause for dismissal of the administrator or for revocation of the certificate of the administrator. Disciplinary action may include suspension without pay for a period of time not to exceed ten school days. Disciplinary action shall not include suspension with pay or suspension without pay for a period of time longer than ten school days. The procedures shall include notice, hearing and appeal provisions for violations that are cause for disciplinary action. The governing board may designate a person or persons to act on behalf of the board on these matters. For violations that are cause for dismissal, the provisions of notice, hearing and appeal in chapter 5, article 3 of this title apply. The filing of a timely request for a hearing suspends the imposition of a suspension without pay or a dismissal pending completion of the hearing. 23. Notwithstanding sections 13-3108 and 13-3120, prescribe and enforce policies and procedures that prohibit a person from carrying or possessing a weapon on school grounds unless the person is a peace officer or has obtained specific authorization from the school administrator.  A school administrator may authorize an employee to carry a concealed firearm on school grounds only as provided by section 15-249.20, subsection D. 24. Prescribe and enforce policies and procedures relating to the health and safety of all pupils participating in district-sponsored practice sessions or games or other interscholastic athletic activities, including: (a) The provision of water. (b) Guidelines, information and forms, developed in consultation with a statewide private entity that supervises interscholastic activities, to inform and educate coaches, pupils and parents of the dangers of concussions and head injuries and the risks of continued participation in athletic activity after a concussion. The policies and procedures shall require that, before a pupil participates in an athletic activity, the pupil and the pupil's parent sign an information form at least once each school year that states that the parent is aware of the nature and risk of concussion. The policies and procedures shall require that a pupil who is suspected of sustaining a concussion in a practice session, game or other interscholastic athletic activity be immediately removed from the athletic activity and that the pupil's parent or guardian be notified.  A coach from the pupil's team or an official or a licensed health care provider may remove a pupil from play. A team parent may also remove the parent's own child from play. A pupil may return to play on the same day if a health care provider rules out a suspected concussion at the time the pupil is removed from play. On a subsequent day, the pupil may return to play if the pupil has been evaluated by and received written clearance to resume participation in athletic activity from a health care provider who has been trained in evaluating and managing concussions and head injuries. A health care provider who is a volunteer and who provides clearance to participate in athletic activity on the day of the suspected injury or on a subsequent day is immune from civil liability with respect to all decisions made and actions taken that are based on good faith implementation of the requirements of this subdivision, except in cases of gross negligence or wanton or wilful neglect. A school district, school district employee, team coach, official or team volunteer or a parent or guardian of a team member is not subject to civil liability for any act, omission or policy undertaken in good faith to comply with the requirements of this subdivision or for a decision made or an action taken by a health care provider. A group or organization that uses property or facilities owned or operated by a school district for athletic activities shall comply with the requirements of this subdivision. A school district and its employees and volunteers are not subject to civil liability for any other person or organization's failure or alleged failure to comply with the requirements of this subdivision. This subdivision does not apply to teams that are based in another state and that participate in an athletic activity in this state. For the purposes of this subdivision, athletic activity does not include dance, rhythmic gymnastics, competitions or exhibitions of academic skills or knowledge or other similar forms of physical noncontact activities, civic activities or academic activities, whether engaged in for the purposes of competition or recreation. For the purposes of this subdivision, "health care provider" means a physician who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13, 14 or 17, an athletic trainer who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 41, a nurse practitioner who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 15, and a physician assistant who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 25. (c) Guidelines, information and forms that are developed in consultation with a statewide private entity that supervises interscholastic activities to inform and educate coaches, pupils and parents of the dangers of heat-related illnesses, sudden cardiac death and prescription opioid use. Before a pupil participates in any district-sponsored practice session or game or other interscholastic athletic activity, the pupil and the pupil's parent must be provided with information at least once each school year on the risks of heat-related illnesses, sudden cardiac death and prescription opioid addiction. 25. Establish an assessment, data gathering and reporting system as prescribed in chapter 7, article 3 of this title. 26. Provide special education programs and related services pursuant to section 15-764, subsection A to all children with disabilities as defined in section 15-761. 27. Administer competency tests prescribed by the state board of education for the graduation of pupils from high school. 28. Ensure that insurance coverage is secured for all construction projects for purposes of general liability, property damage and workers' compensation and secure performance and payment bonds for all construction projects. 29. Collect and maintain information about each current and former teacher's educational and teaching background and experience in a particular academic content subject area. A school district shall either post the information on the school district's website or make the information available for inspection on request of parents and guardians of pupils enrolled at a school. This paragraph does not require any school to release personally identifiable information in relation to any teacher, including the teacher's address, salary, social security number or telephone number. 30. Report to local law enforcement agencies any suspected crime against a person or property that is a serious offense as defined in section 13-706 or that involves a deadly weapon or dangerous instrument or serious physical injury and any conduct that poses a threat of death or serious physical injury to employees, students or anyone on the property of the school. This paragraph does not limit or preclude the reporting by a school district or an employee of a school district of suspected crimes other than those required to be reported by this paragraph. For the purposes of this paragraph, "dangerous instrument", "deadly weapon" and "serious physical injury" have the same meanings prescribed in section 13-105. 31. In conjunction with local law enforcement agencies and emergency response agencies, develop an emergency response plan for each school in the school district in accordance with minimum standards developed jointly by the department of education and the division of emergency management within the department of emergency and military affairs. Any emergency response plan developed pursuant to this paragraph must address how the school and emergency responders will communicate with and provide assistance to students with disabilities. 32. Provide written notice to the parents or guardians of all students enrolled in the school district at least ten days before a public meeting to discuss closing a school within the school district. The notice shall include the reasons for the proposed closure and the time and place of the meeting. The governing board shall fix a time for a public meeting on the proposed closure not less than ten days before voting in a public meeting to close the school. The school district governing board shall give notice of the time and place of the meeting. At the time and place designated in the notice, the school district governing board shall hear reasons for or against closing the school. The school district governing board is exempt from this paragraph if the governing board determines that the school shall be closed because it poses a danger to the health or safety of the pupils or employees of the school. A governing board may consult with the division of school facilities within the department of administration for technical assistance and for information on the impact of closing a school. The information provided from the division of school facilities within the department of administration shall not require the governing board to take or not take any action. 33. Incorporate instruction on Native American history into appropriate existing curricula. 34. Prescribe and enforce policies and procedures: (a) Allowing pupils who have been diagnosed with anaphylaxis by a health care provider licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13, 14, 17 or 25 or by a registered nurse practitioner licensed and certified pursuant to title 32, chapter 15 to carry and self-administer emergency medications, including epinephrine delivery systems, while at school and at school-sponsored activities. The pupil's name on the prescription label on the medication container or on the medication device and annual written documentation from the pupil's parent or guardian to the school that authorizes possession and self-administration is sufficient proof that the pupil is entitled to possess and self-administer the medication. The policies shall require a pupil who uses an epinephrine delivery system while at school and at school-sponsored activities to notify the nurse or the designated school staff person of the use of the medication as soon as practicable. A school district and its employees are immune from civil liability with respect to all decisions made and actions taken that are based on good faith implementation of the requirements of this subdivision, except in cases of wanton or wilful neglect. (b) For the emergency administration of epinephrine delivery systems by a trained employee of a school district pursuant to section 15-157. 35. Allow the possession and self-administration of prescription medication for breathing disorders in handheld inhaler devices by pupils who have been prescribed that medication by a health care professional licensed pursuant to title 32. The pupil's name on the prescription label on the medication container or on the handheld inhaler device and annual written documentation from the pupil's parent or guardian to the school that authorizes possession and self-administration is sufficient proof that the pupil is entitled to possess and self-administer the medication. A school district and its employees are immune from civil liability with respect to all decisions made and actions taken that are based on a good faith implementation of the requirements of this paragraph. 36. Prescribe and enforce policies and procedures to prohibit pupils from harassing, intimidating and bullying other pupils on school grounds, on school property, on school buses, at school bus stops, at school-sponsored events and activities and through the use of electronic technology or electronic communication on school computers, networks, forums and mailing lists that include the following components: (a) A procedure for pupils, parents and school district employees to confidentially report to school officials incidents of harassment, intimidation or bullying. The school shall make available written forms designed to provide a full and detailed description of the incident and any other relevant information about the incident. (b) A requirement that school district employees report in writing suspected incidents of harassment, intimidation or bullying to the appropriate school official and a description of appropriate disciplinary procedures for employees who fail to report suspected incidents that are known to the employee. (c) A requirement that, at the beginning of each school year, school officials provide all pupils with a written copy of the rights, protections and support services available to a pupil who is an alleged victim of an incident reported pursuant to this paragraph. (d) If an incident is reported pursuant to this paragraph, a requirement that school officials provide a pupil who is an alleged victim of the incident with a written copy of the rights, protections and support services available to that pupil. (e) A formal process for documenting reported incidents of harassment, intimidation or bullying and providing for the confidentiality, maintenance and disposition of this documentation. School districts shall maintain documentation of all incidents reported pursuant to this paragraph for at least six years. The school shall not use that documentation to impose disciplinary action unless the appropriate school official has investigated and determined that the reported incidents of harassment, intimidation or bullying occurred. If a school provides documentation of reported incidents to persons other than school officials or law enforcement, all individually identifiable information shall be redacted. (f) A formal process for the appropriate school officials to investigate suspected incidents of harassment, intimidation or bullying, including procedures for notifying the alleged victim and the alleged victim's parent or guardian when a school official or employee becomes aware of the suspected incident of harassment, intimidation or bullying. (g) Disciplinary procedures for pupils who have admitted or been found to have committed incidents of harassment, intimidation or bullying. (h) A procedure that sets forth consequences for submitting false reports of incidents of harassment, intimidation or bullying. (i) Procedures designed to protect the health and safety of pupils who are physically harmed as the result of incidents of harassment, intimidation and bullying, including, if appropriate, procedures to contact emergency medical services or law enforcement agencies, or both. (j) Definitions of harassment, intimidation and bullying. 37. Prescribe and enforce policies and procedures regarding changing or adopting attendance boundaries that include the following components: (a) A procedure for holding public meetings to discuss attendance boundary changes or adoptions that allows public comments. (b) A procedure to notify the parents or guardians of the students affected, including assurance that, if that school remains open as part of the boundary change and capacity is available, students assigned to a new attendance area may stay enrolled in their current school. (c) A procedure to notify the residents of the households affected by the attendance boundary changes. (d) A process for placing public meeting notices and proposed maps on the school district's website for public review, if the school district maintains a website. (e) A formal process for presenting the attendance boundaries of the affected area in public meetings that allows public comments. (f) A formal process for notifying the residents and parents or guardians of the affected area as to the decision of the governing board on the school district's website, if the school district maintains a website. (g) A formal process for updating attendance boundaries on the school district's website within ninety days after an adopted boundary change. The school district shall send a direct link to the school district's attendance boundaries website to the department of real estate. 38. If the state board of education determines that the school district has committed an overexpenditure as defined in section 15-107, provide a copy of the fiscal management report submitted pursuant to section 15-107, subsection H on its website and make copies available to the public on request. The school district shall comply with a request within five business days after receipt. 39. Ensure that the contract for the superintendent is structured in a manner in which up to twenty percent of the total annual salary included for the superintendent in the contract is classified as performance pay. This paragraph does not require school districts to increase total compensation for superintendents. Unless the school district governing board votes to implement an alternative procedure at a public meeting called for this purpose, the performance pay portion of the superintendent's total annual compensation shall be determined as follows: (a) Twenty-five percent of the performance pay shall be determined based on the percentage of academic gain determined by the department of education of pupils who are enrolled in the school district compared to the academic gain achieved by the highest ranking of the fifty largest school districts in this state. For the purposes of this subdivision, the department of education shall determine academic gain by the academic growth achieved by each pupil who has been enrolled at the same school in a school district for at least five consecutive months measured against that pupil's academic results in the 2008-2009 school year. For the purposes of this subdivision, of the fifty largest school districts in this state, the school district with pupils who demonstrate the highest statewide percentage of overall academic gain measured against academic results for the 2008-2009 school year shall be assigned a score of 100 and the school district with pupils who demonstrate the lowest statewide percentage of overall academic gain measured against academic results for the 2008-2009 school year shall be assigned a score of 0. (b) Twenty-five percent of the performance pay shall be determined by the percentage of parents of pupils who are enrolled at the school district who assign a letter grade of "A" to the school on a survey of parental satisfaction with the school district. The parental satisfaction survey shall be administered and scored by an independent entity that is selected by the governing board and that demonstrates sufficient expertise and experience to accurately measure the results of the survey. The parental satisfaction survey shall use standard random sampling procedures and provide anonymity and confidentiality to each parent who participates in the survey. The letter grade scale used on the parental satisfaction survey shall direct parents to assign one of the following letter grades: (i) A letter grade of "A" if the school district is excellent. (ii) A letter grade of "B" if the school district is above average. (iii) A letter grade of "C" if the school district is average. (iv) A letter grade of "D" if the school district is below average. (v) A letter grade of "F" if the school district is a failure. (c) Twenty-five percent of the performance pay shall be determined by the percentage of teachers who are employed at the school district and who assign a letter grade of "A" to the school on a survey of teacher satisfaction with the school. The teacher satisfaction survey shall be administered and scored by an independent entity that is selected by the governing board and that demonstrates sufficient expertise and experience to accurately measure the results of the survey. The teacher satisfaction survey shall use standard random sampling procedures and provide anonymity and confidentiality to each teacher who participates in the survey. The letter grade scale used on the teacher satisfaction survey shall direct teachers to assign one of the following letter grades: (i) A letter grade of "A" if the school district is excellent. (ii) A letter grade of "B" if the school district is above average. (iii) A letter grade of "C" if the school district is average. (iv) A letter grade of "D" if the school district is below average. (v) A letter grade of "F" if the school district is a failure. (d) Twenty-five percent of the performance pay shall be determined by other criteria selected by the governing board. 40. Maintain and store permanent public records of the school district as required by law. Notwithstanding section 39-101, the standards adopted by the Arizona state library, archives and public records for the maintenance and storage of school district public records shall allow school districts to elect to satisfy the requirements of this paragraph by maintaining and storing these records either on paper or in an electronic format, or a combination of a paper and electronic format. 41. Adopt in a public meeting and implement policies for principal evaluations. Before adopting principal evaluation policies, the school district governing board shall provide opportunities for public discussion on the proposed policies. The governing board shall adopt policies that: (a) Are designed to improve principal performance and improve student achievement. (b) Include the use of quantitative data on the academic progress for all students, which shall account for between twenty percent and thirty-three percent of the evaluation outcomes. (c) Include four performance classifications, designated as highly effective, effective, developing and ineffective. (d) Describe both of the following: (i) The methods used to evaluate the performance of principals, including the data used to measure student performance and job effectiveness. (ii) The formula used to determine evaluation outcomes. 42. Prescribe and enforce policies and procedures that define the duties of principals and teachers. These policies and procedures shall authorize teachers to take and maintain daily classroom attendance, make the decision to promote or retain a pupil in a grade in common school or to pass or fail a pupil in a course in high school, subject to review by the governing board in the manner provided in section 15-342, paragraph 11. 43. Prescribe and enforce policies and procedures for the emergency administration by an employee of a school district pursuant to section 36-2267 of naloxone hydrochloride or any other opioid antagonist approved by the United States food and drug administration. 44. In addition to the notification requirements prescribed in paragraph 36 of this subsection, prescribe and enforce reasonable and appropriate policies to notify a pupil's parent or guardian if any person engages in harassing, threatening or intimidating conduct against that pupil.  A school district and its officials and employees are immune from civil liability with respect to all decisions made and actions taken that are based on good faith implementation of the requirements of this paragraph, except in cases of gross negligence or wanton or wilful neglect.  A person engages in threatening or intimidating if the person threatens or intimidates by word or conduct to cause physical injury to another person or serious damage to the property of another on school grounds.  A person engages in harassment if, with intent to harass or with knowledge that the person is harassing another person, the person anonymously or otherwise contacts, communicates or causes a communication with another person by verbal, electronic, mechanical, telephonic or written means in a manner that harasses on school grounds or substantially disrupts the school environment. 45. Each fiscal year, provide to each school district employee a total compensation statement that is broken down by category of benefit or payment and that includes, for that employee, at least all of the following: (a) Base salary and any additional pay. (b) Medical benefits and the value of any employer-paid portions of insurance plan premiums. (c) Retirement benefit plans, including social security. (d) Legally required benefits. (e) Any paid leave. (f) Any other payment made to or on behalf of the employee. (g) Any other benefit provided to the employee. 46. Develop and adopt in a public meeting policies to allow for visits, tours and observations of all classrooms by parents of enrolled pupils and parents who wish to enroll their children in the school district unless a visit, tour or observation threatens the health and safety of pupils and staff.  These policies and procedures must be easily accessible from the home page on each school's website. B. Notwithstanding subsection A, paragraphs 7, 9 and 11 of this section, the county school superintendent may construct, improve and furnish school buildings or purchase or sell school sites in the conduct of an accommodation school. C. If any school district acquires real or personal property, whether by purchase, exchange, condemnation, gift or otherwise, the governing board shall pay to the county treasurer any taxes on the property that were unpaid as of the date of acquisition, including penalties and interest.  The lien for unpaid delinquent taxes, penalties and interest on property acquired by a school district: 1. Is not abated, extinguished, discharged or merged in the title to the property. 2. Is enforceable in the same manner as other delinquent tax liens. D. The governing board may not locate a school on property that is less than one-fourth mile from agricultural land regulated pursuant to section 3-365, except that the owner of the agricultural land may agree to comply with the buffer zone requirements of section 3-365. If the owner agrees in writing to comply with the buffer zone requirements and records the agreement in the office of the county recorder as a restrictive covenant running with the title to the land, the school district may locate a school within the affected buffer zone. The agreement may include any stipulations regarding the school, including conditions for future expansion of the school and changes in the operational status of the school that will result in a breach of the agreement. E. A school district, its governing board members, its school council members and its employees are immune from civil liability for the consequences of adopting and implementing policies and procedures pursuant to subsection A of this section and section 15-342.  This waiver does not apply if the school district, its governing board members, its school council members or its employees are guilty of gross negligence or intentional misconduct. F. A governing board may delegate in writing to a superintendent, principal or head teacher the authority to prescribe procedures that are consistent with the governing board's policies. G. Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, a school district governing board shall not take any action that would result in a reduction of pupil square footage unless the governing board notifies the school facilities oversight board established by section 41-5701.02 of the proposed action and receives written approval from the school facilities oversight board to take the action. A reduction includes an increase in administrative space that results in a reduction of pupil square footage or sale of school sites or buildings, or both. A reduction includes a reconfiguration of grades that results in a reduction of pupil square footage of any grade level. This subsection does not apply to temporary reconfiguration of grades to accommodate new school construction if the temporary reconfiguration does not exceed one year. The sale of equipment that results in a reduction that falls below the equipment requirements prescribed in section 41-5711, subsection B is subject to commensurate withholding of school district district additional assistance monies pursuant to the direction of the school facilities oversight board.  Except as provided in section 15-342, paragraph 10, proceeds from the sale of school sites, buildings or other equipment shall be deposited in the school plant fund as provided in section 15-1102. H. Subsections C through G of this section apply to a county board of supervisors and a county school superintendent when operating and administering an accommodation school. I. A school district governing board may delegate authority in writing to the superintendent of the school district to submit plans for new school facilities to the school facilities oversight board for the purpose of certifying that the plans meet the minimum school facility adequacy guidelines prescribed in section 41-5711. J. For the purposes of subsection A, paragraph 37 of this section, attendance boundaries may not be used to require students to attend certain schools based on the student's place of residence. END_STATUTE Sec. 3.3. Section 41-1822, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1822. Powers and duties of board; definition A. With respect to peace officer training and certification, the board shall: 1. Establish rules for the government and conduct of the board, including meeting times and places and matters to be placed on the agenda of each meeting. 2. Make recommendations, consistent with this article, to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate on all matters relating to law enforcement and public safety. 3. Prescribe reasonable minimum qualifications for officers to be appointed to enforce the laws of this state and the political subdivisions of this state and certify officers in compliance with these qualifications. Notwithstanding any other law, the qualifications shall require United States citizenship, shall relate to physical, mental and moral fitness and shall govern the recruitment, appointment and retention of all agents, peace officers and police officers of every political subdivision of this state. The board shall constantly review the qualifications established by this section and may amend the qualifications at any time, subject to the requirements of section 41-1823. 4. Prescribe minimum courses of training and minimum standards for training facilities for law enforcement officers. Only this state and political subdivisions of this state may conduct basic peace officer training.  Basic peace officer academies may admit individuals who are not peace officer cadets only if a cadet meets the minimum qualifications established by paragraph 3 of this subsection. Training shall include: (a) Courses in responding to and reporting all criminal offenses that are motivated by race, color, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender or disability. (b) Training certified by the director of the department of health services with assistance from a representative of the board on the nature of unexplained infant death and the handling of cases involving the unexplained death of an infant. (c) Medical information on unexplained infant death for first responders, including awareness and sensitivity in dealing with families and child care providers, and the importance of forensically competent death scene investigations. (d) Information on the protocol of investigation in cases of an unexplained infant death, including the importance of a consistent policy of thorough death scene investigation. (e) The use of the infant death investigation checklist pursuant to section 36-3506. (f) If an unexplained infant death occurs, the value of timely communication between the medical examiner's office, the department of health services and appropriate social service agencies that address the issue of infant death and bereavement, to achieve a better understanding of these deaths and to connect families to various community and public health support systems to enhance recovery from grief. 5. Recommend curricula for advanced courses and seminars in law enforcement and intelligence training in universities, colleges and community colleges, in conjunction with the governing body of the educational institution. 6. Make inquiries to determine whether this state or political subdivisions of this state are adhering to the standards for recruitment, appointment, retention and training established pursuant to this article. The failure of this state or any political subdivision to adhere to the standards shall be reported at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board for action deemed appropriate by that body. 7. Employ an executive director and other staff as are necessary to fulfill the powers and duties of the board in accordance with the requirements of the law enforcement merit system council. B. With respect to state department of corrections correctional officers, the board shall: 1. Approve a basic training curriculum of at least two hundred forty hours. 2. Establish uniform minimum standards. These standards shall include high school graduation or the equivalent and a physical examination as prescribed by the director of the state department of corrections. 3. Establish uniform standards for background investigations, including criminal histories under section 41-1750, of all applicants before enrolling in the academy. The board may adopt special procedures for extended screening and investigations in extraordinary cases to ensure suitability and adaptability to a career as a correctional officer. 4. Issue a certificate of completion to any state department of corrections correctional officer who satisfactorily complies with the minimum standards and completes the basic training program. The board may issue a certificate of completion to a state department of corrections correctional officer who has received comparable training in another state if the board determines that the training was at least equivalent to that provided by the academy and if the person complies with the minimum standards. 5. Establish continuing training requirements and approve curricula. C. In consultation with the DEPARTMENT of education, the board shall establish uniform standards for training and certification programs for which a school or school employee may be reimbursed pursuant to section 15-249.20, subsection C that include the following: 1. For initial certification, each of the following: (a) At least four hours of training on state law use-of-force justification that is provided by a peace officer, an attorney or a firearms safety training instructor as defined in section 32-2601. (b) At least twenty-four hours of firearms safety, marksmanship, judgment and decision-making training provided by a peace officer, a firearms safety training instructor as defined in section 32-2601 or an instructor who conducts a pistol qualifying examination pursuant to section 38-1113. (c) At least four hours of tactical emergency casualty care training provided by an emergency medical care technician as defined in section 36-2201, a registered nurse as defined in section 32-1601 or a licensed physician. (d) At least eight hours of scenario-based training that demonstrates competency in decision-making, weapons handling and medical intervention. 2. For annual recertification, A board-prescribed firearms qualification course. D. The board shall: 1. Accept applications, in a form and manner prescribed by the board, for training and certification programs to be included on the lIST that is developed and maintained pursuant to section 15-249.20, subsection B. 2. Approve an application for any training and certification program that meets or exceeds the standards established pursuant to subsection C of this section. 3. Monitor approved training and certification programs to ensure that each program continues to satisfy the standards established pursuant to subsection C of this section. If a program falls below the standards established pursuant to subsection C of this section and the program provider fails to correct the deficiencies, the board shall remove that program from the list that is developed and maintained pursuant to section 15-249.20. C. e. With respect to peace officer misconduct, the board may: 1. Receive complaints of peace officer misconduct from any person, request law enforcement agencies to conduct investigations and conduct independent investigations into whether an officer is in compliance with the qualifications established pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 3 of this section. 2. Receive a complaint of peace officer misconduct from the president or chief executive officer of a board recognized law enforcement association that represents the interests of certified law enforcement officers if the association believes that a law enforcement agency refused to investigate or made findings that are contradictory to prima facie evidence of a violation of the qualifications established pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 3 of this section.  If the board finds that the law enforcement agency refused to investigate or made findings that contradicted prima facie evidence of a violation of the qualifications established pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 3 of this section, the board shall conduct an independent investigation to determine whether the officer is in compliance with the qualifications established pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 3 of this section and provide a letter of the findings based on the investigation conducted by the board to the president or chief executive officer of the board recognized law enforcement association who made the complaint. D. f. The board may: 1. Deny, suspend, revoke or cancel the certification of an officer who is not in compliance with the qualifications established pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 3 of this section. 2. Provide training and related services to assist state, tribal and local law enforcement agencies to better serve the public, including training for emergency alert notification systems. 3. Enter into contracts to carry out its powers and duties. E. g. This section does not create a cause of action or a right to bring an action, including an action based on discrimination due to sexual orientation. F. h. For the purposes of this section, "sexual orientation" means consensual homosexuality or heterosexuality. END_STATUTE